Massachusetts, session 194th, S1623.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 111, as appearing in the Massachusetts General Laws 2022 Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting, after section 72BB the following new section:-
Section 72CC. (a) As used in this section the following words shall have the following
meaning:- A certified medication aide means a staff member, who meets the eligibility
requirements, has successfully completed the required training and competency testing
developed by the Department of Public Health, and is considered competent to administer oral
and topical non-narcotic medications to residents in long-term care facilities.
(b) The Department shall create a program for the administration of medications in long-
term care facilities by certified medication aides in consultation with all necessary and relevant
of 2

appropriate agencies, and licensing boards, including, but not limited to, the Board of
Registration in Nursing.
(c) The Department shall develop and approve training curricula, competency evaluation
procedures, standards for qualifications of applicants for certification and monitoring and
oversight requirements for participating long-term care facilities.
(d) The Department shall establish regulations that include: (1) provisions for continuing
education requirements for certified medication aides; (2) requirements for re-certification of
certified medication aides on a biennial basis; and (3) fees for the issuance of certification to
certified medication aides.
(e) The Department shall allow for the creation of apprenticeship programs for currently
employed resident care assistants (RCAs) and certified nurse aides (CNAs) to become certified
medication aides.
(f) The Department may promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of
this section.
of 2